Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 1 Short Title, Definitions, and General Concepts

11-9-101.
Short title.

This article may be cited as “Uniform Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.”

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-101, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-102.
Definitions and index of definitions.

Article 9 definitions.As used in this article, the term:

“Accession” means goods that are physically united with other goods in such a manner that the identity of the original goods is not lost.

“Account,” except as used in “account for,” means a right to payment of a monetary obligation, whether or not earned by performance, (i) for property that has been or is to be sold, leased, licensed, assigned, or otherwise disposed of, (ii) for services rendered or to be rendered, (iii) for a policy of insurance issued or to be issued, (iv) for a secondary obligation incurred or to be incurred, (v) for energy provided or to be provided, (vi) for the use or hire of a vessel under a charter or other contract, (vii) arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card, or (viii) as winnings in a lottery or other game of chance operated or sponsored by a state, governmental unit of a state, or person licensed or authorized to operate the game by a state or governmental unit of a state. The term includes health care insurance receivables. The term does not include (i) rights to payment evidenced by chattel paper or an instrument, (ii) commercial tort claims, (iii) deposit accounts, (iv) investment property, (v) letter of credit rights or letters of credit, or (vi) rights to payment for money or funds advanced or sold, other than rights arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card.

“Account debtor” means a person obligated on an account, chattel paper, or general intangible. The term does not include persons obligated to pay a negotiable instrument, even if the instrument constitutes part of chattel paper.

“Accounting,” except as used in “accounting for,” means a record:

Authenticated by a secured party;

Indicating the aggregate unpaid secured obligations as of a date not more than 35 days earlier or 35 days later than the date of the record; and

Identifying the components of the obligations in reasonable detail.

“Agricultural lien” means an interest in farm products:

Which secures payment or performance of an obligation for:

Goods or services furnished in connection with a debtor’s farming operation; or

Rent on real property leased by a debtor in connection with its farming operation;

Which is created by statute in favor of a person that:

In the ordinary course of its business furnished goods or services to a debtor in connection with a debtor’s farming operation; or

Leased real property to a debtor in connection with the debtor’s farming operation; and

Whose effectiveness does not depend on the person’s possession of the personal property.

“As-extracted collateral” means:

Oil, gas, or other minerals that are subject to a security interest that:

Is created by a debtor having an interest in the minerals before extraction; and

Attaches to the minerals as extracted; or

Accounts arising out of the sale at the wellhead or minehead of oil, gas, or other minerals in which the debtor had an interest before extraction.

“Authenticate” means:

To sign; or

With present intent to adopt or accept a record, to attach to or logically associate with such record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

“Authority” means the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority.

“Bank” means an organization that is engaged in the business of banking. The term includes savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, and trust companies.

“Cash proceeds” means proceeds that are money, checks, deposit accounts, or the like.

“Certificate of title” means a certificate of title with respect to which a statute provides for the security interest in question to be indicated on the certificate as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral. The term shall include another record maintained as an alternative to a certificate of title by the governmental unit that issues certificates of title if a statute permits the security interest in question to be indicated on the record as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral.

“Chattel paper” means a record or records that evidence both a monetary obligation and a security interest in specific goods, a security interest in specific goods and software used in the goods, a lease of specific goods, or a lease of specific goods and license of software used in the goods. As used in this paragraph, “monetary obligation” means a monetary obligation secured by the goods or owed under a lease of the goods and includes a monetary obligation with respect to software used in the goods. The term does not include:

Charters or other contracts involving the use or hire of a vessel; or

Records that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card.

If a transaction is evidenced by records that include an instrument or series of instruments, the group of records taken together constitutes chattel paper.

“Collateral” means the property subject to a security interest or agricultural lien. The term includes:

Proceeds to which a security interest attaches;

Accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes that have been sold; and

Goods that are the subject of a consignment.

“Commercial tort claim” means a claim arising in tort with respect to which:

The claimant is an organization; or

The claimant is an individual and the claim:

Arose in the course of the claimant’s business or profession; and

Does not include damages arising out of personal injury to or the death of an individual.

“Commodity account” means an account maintained by a commodity intermediary in which a commodity contract is carried for a commodity customer.

“Commodity contract” means a commodity futures contract, an option on a commodity futures contract, a commodity option, or another contract if the contract or option is:

Traded on or subject to the rules of a board of trade that has been designated as a contract market for such a contract pursuant to federal commodities laws; or

Traded on a foreign commodity board of trade, exchange, or market and is carried on the books of a commodity intermediary for a commodity customer.

“Commodity customer” means a person for which a commodity intermediary carries a commodity contract on its books.

“Commodity intermediary” means a person that:

Is registered as a futures commission merchant under federal commodities law; or

In the ordinary course of its business provides clearance or settlement services for a board of trade that has been designated as a contract market pursuant to federal commodities law.

“Communicate” means:

To send a written or other tangible record;

To transmit a record by any means agreed upon by the persons sending and receiving the record; or

In the case of transmission of a record to or by a filing office or the authority, to transmit a record by any means prescribed by filing office rule.

“Consignee” means a merchant to which goods are delivered in a consignment.

“Consignment” means a transaction, regardless of its form, in which a person delivers goods to a merchant for the purpose of sale and:

The merchant:

Deals in goods of that kind under a name other than the name of the person making delivery;

Is not an auctioneer; and

Is not generally known by its creditors to be substantially engaged in selling the goods of others;

With respect to each delivery, the aggregate value of the goods is $1,000.00 or more at the time of delivery;

The goods are not consumer goods immediately before delivery; and

The transaction does not create a security interest that secures an obligation.

“Consignor” means a person that delivers goods to a consignee in a consignment.

“Consumer debtor” means a debtor in a consumer transaction.

“Consumer goods” means goods that are used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

“Consumer goods transaction” means a consumer transaction in which:

An individual incurs an obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; and

A security interest in consumer goods secures the obligation.

“Consumer obligor” means an obligor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation as part of a transaction entered into primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

“Consumer transaction” means a transaction in which (i) an individual incurs an obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, (ii) a security interest secures the obligation, and (iii) the collateral is held or acquired primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. The term includes consumer goods transactions.

“Continuation statement” means an amendment of a financing statement which:

Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates; and

Indicates that it is a continuation statement for, or that it is filed to continue the effectiveness of, the identified financing statement.

“Debtor” means:

A person having an interest, other than a security interest or other lien, in the collateral, whether or not the person is an obligor;

A seller of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes; or

A consignee.

“Deposit account” means a demand, time, savings, passbook, or similar account maintained with a bank. The term does not include investment property or accounts evidenced by an instrument.

“Document” means a document of title or a receipt of the type described in subsection (2) of Code Section 11-7-201.

“Electronic chattel paper” means chattel paper evidenced by a record or records consisting of information stored in an electronic medium.

“Encumbrance” means a right, other than an ownership interest, in real property. The term includes mortgages and other liens on real property.

“Equipment” means goods other than inventory, farm products, or consumer goods.

“Farm products” means goods, other than standing timber, with respect to which the debtor is engaged in a farming operation and which are:

Crops grown, growing, or to be grown, including:

Crops produced on trees, vines, and bushes; and

Aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;

Livestock, born or unborn, including aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;

Supplies used or produced in a farming operation; or

Products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured states.

“Farming operation” means raising, cultivating, propagating, fattening, grazing, or any other farming, livestock, or aquacultural operation.

“File number” means the number assigned to an initial financing statement pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-519.

“Filing office” means an office designated in Code Section 11-9-501 as the place to file a financing statement.

“Filing office rule” means a rule adopted pursuant to Code Section 11-9-526.

“Financing statement” means a record or records composed of an initial financing statement and any filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

“Fixture filing” means the filing of a financing statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and satisfying subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 11-9-502. The term includes the filing of a financing statement covering goods of a transmitting utility which are or are to become fixtures.

“Fixtures” means goods that have become so related to particular real property that an interest in them arises under real property law.

“General intangible” means any personal property, including things in action, other than accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, goods, instruments, investment property, letter of credit rights, letters of credit, money, and oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction. The term includes payment intangibles and software.

Reserved.

“Goods” means all things that are movable when a security interest attaches. The term includes (i) fixtures, (ii) standing timber that is to be cut and removed under a conveyance or contract for sale, (iii) the unborn young of animals, and (iv) crops grown, growing, or to be grown, even if the crops are produced on trees, vines, or bushes. The term also includes a computer program embedded in goods and any supporting information provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program if (i) the program is associated with the goods in such a manner that it customarily is considered part of the goods, or (ii) by becoming the owner of the goods, a person acquires a right to use the program in connection with the goods. The term does not include a computer program embedded in goods that consist solely of the medium in which the program is embedded. The term also does not include accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, general intangibles, instruments, investment property, letter of credit rights, letters of credit, money, or oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction.

“Governmental unit” means a subdivision, agency, department, county, parish, municipality, or other unit of the government of the United States, a state, or a foreign country. The term includes an organization having a separate corporate existence if the organization is eligible to issue debt on which interest is exempt from income taxation under the laws of the United States.

“Health care insurance receivable” means an interest in or claim under a policy of insurance which is a right to payment of a monetary obligation for health care goods or services provided or to be provided.

“Instrument” means a negotiable instrument or any other writing that evidences a right to the payment of a monetary obligation, is not itself a security agreement or lease, and is of a type that in ordinary course of business is transferred by delivery with any necessary indorsement or assignment. The term does not include (i) investment property, (ii) letters of credit, or (iii) writings that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card.

“Inventory” means goods, other than farm products, which:

Are leased by a person as lessor;

Are held by a person for sale or lease or to be furnished under a contract of service;

Are furnished by a person under a contract of service; or

Consist of raw materials, work in process, or materials used or consumed in a business.

“Investment property” means a security, whether certificated or uncertificated, security entitlement, securities account, commodity contract, or commodity account.

“Jurisdiction of organization,” with respect to a registered organization, means the jurisdiction under whose law the organization is formed or organized.

“Letter of credit right” means a right to payment or performance under a letter of credit, whether or not the beneficiary has demanded or is at the time entitled to demand payment or performance. The term does not include the right of a beneficiary to demand payment or performance under a letter of credit.

“Lien creditor” means:

A creditor that has acquired a lien on the property involved by attachment, levy, or the like;

An assignee for benefit of creditors from the time of assignment;

A trustee in bankruptcy from the date of the filing of the petition; or

A receiver in equity from the time of appointment.

“Mortgage” means a consensual interest in real property, including fixtures, which secures payment or performance of an obligation. The term includes a deed to secure debt.

“New debtor” means a person that becomes bound as debtor under subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-203 by a security agreement previously entered into by another person.

“New value” means (i) money, (ii) money’s worth in property, services, or new credit, or (iii) release by a transferee of an interest in property previously transferred to the transferee. The term does not include an obligation substituted for another obligation.

“Noncash proceeds” means proceeds other than cash proceeds.

“Obligor” means a person that, with respect to an obligation secured by a security interest in or an agricultural lien on the collateral, (i) owes payment or other performance of the obligation, (ii) has provided property other than the collateral to secure payment or other performance of the obligation, or (iii) is otherwise accountable in whole or in part for payment or other performance of the obligation. The term does not include issuers or nominated persons under a letter of credit.

“Original debtor,” except as used in subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-310, means a person that, as debtor, entered into a security agreement to which a new debtor has become bound under subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-203.

“Payment intangible” means a general intangible under which the account debtor’s principal obligation is a monetary obligation.

“Person related to,” with respect to an individual, means:

The spouse of the individual;

A brother, brother-in-law, sister, or sister-in-law of the individual;

An ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or the individual’s spouse; or

Any other relative, by blood or marriage, of the individual or the individual’s spouse who shares the same home with the individual.

“Person related to,” with respect to an organization, means:

A person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the organization;

An officer or director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, the organization;

An officer or director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, a person described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

The spouse of an individual described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph; or

An individual who is related by blood or marriage to an individual described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this paragraph and shares the same home with the individual.

“Proceeds,” except as used in subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-609, means the following property:

Whatever is acquired upon the sale, lease, license, exchange, or other disposition of collateral;

Whatever is collected on, or distributed on account of, collateral;

Rights arising out of collateral;

To the extent of the value of collateral, claims arising out of the loss, nonconformity, or interference with the use of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to the collateral; or

To the extent of the value of collateral and to the extent payable to the debtor or the secured party, insurance payable by reason of the loss or nonconformity of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to the collateral.

“Promissory note” means an instrument that evidences a promise to pay a monetary obligation, does not evidence an order to pay, and does not contain an acknowledgment by a bank that the bank has received for deposit a sum of money or funds.

“Proposal” means a record authenticated by a secured party which includes the terms on which the secured party is willing to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures pursuant to Code Sections 11-9-620, 11-9-621, and 11-9-622.

“Public finance transaction” means a secured transaction in connection with which:

Debt securities are issued;

All or a portion of the securities issued have an initial stated maturity of at least five years; and

The debtor, obligor, secured party, account debtor or other person obligated on collateral, assignor or assignee of a secured obligation, or assignor or assignee of a security interest is a state or a governmental unit of a state.

“Public organic record” means a record that is available to the public for inspection and is:

A record consisting of the record initially filed with or issued by a state or the United States to form or organize an organization and any record filed with or issued by such state or the United States which amends or restates the initial record;

An organic record of a business trust consisting of the record initially filed with a state and any record filed with such state which amends or restates the initial record, if a statute of such state governing business trusts requires that the record be filed with such state; or

A record consisting of legislation enacted by the legislature of a state or the Congress of the United States which forms or organizes an organization, any record amending the legislation, and any record filed with or issued by such state or the United States which amends or restates the name of the organization.

“Pursuant to commitment,” with respect to an advance made or other value given by a secured party, means pursuant to the secured party’s obligation, whether or not a subsequent event of default or other event not within the secured party’s control has relieved or may relieve the secured party from its obligation.

“Record,” except as used in “for record,” “of record,” “record or legal title,” and “record owner,” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or which is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered organization” means an organization formed or organized solely under the law of a single state or the United States by the filing of a public organic record with, the issuance of a public organic record by, or the enactment of legislation by a state or the United States. The term shall include a business trust that is formed or organized under the law of a single state if a statute of such state governing business trusts requires that the business trust’s organic record be filed with such state.

“Secondary obligor” means an obligor to the extent that:

The obligor’s obligation is secondary; or

The obligor has a right of recourse with respect to an obligation secured by collateral against the debtor, another obligor, or property of either.

“Secured party” means:

A person in whose favor a security interest is created or provided for under a security agreement, whether or not any obligation to be secured is outstanding;

A person that holds an agricultural lien;

A consignor;

A person to which accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes have been sold;

A trustee, indenture trustee, agent, collateral agent, or other representative in whose favor a security interest or agricultural lien is created or provided for; or

A person that holds a security interest arising under Code Section 11-2-401, 11-2-505, or subsection (3) of Code Section 11-2-711, subsection (5) of Code Section 11-2A-508, Code Section 11-4-210, or Code Section 11-5-118.

“Security agreement” means an agreement that creates or provides for a security interest.

“Send,” in connection with a record or notification, means:

To deposit in the mail, deliver for transmission, or transmit by any other usual means of communication, with postage or cost of transmission provided for, addressed to any address reasonable under the circumstances; or

To cause the record or notification to be received within the time that it would have been received if properly sent under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

“Software” means a computer program and any supporting information provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program. The term does not include a computer program that is included in the definition of goods.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Supporting obligation” means a letter of credit right or secondary obligation that supports the payment or performance of an account, chattel paper, a document, a general intangible, an instrument, or investment property.

“Tangible chattel paper” means chattel paper evidenced by a record or records consisting of information that is inscribed on a tangible medium.

“Termination statement” means an amendment of a financing statement which:

Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates; and

Indicates either that it is a termination statement or that the identified financing statement is no longer effective.

“Transmitting utility” means a person primarily engaged in the business of:

Operating a railroad, subway, street railway, or trolley bus;

Transmitting communications electrically, electromagnetically, or by light;

Transmitting goods by pipeline or sewer; or

Transmitting or producing and transmitting electricity, steam, gas, or water.

Definitions in other articles.“Control” as provided in Code Section 11-7-106 and the following definitions in other articles apply to this article:

“Applicant.” Code Section 11-5-102.

“Beneficiary.” Code Section 11-5-102.

“Broker.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Certificated security.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Check.” Code Section 11-3-104.

“Clearing corporation.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Contract for sale.” Code Section 11-2-106.

“Customer.” Code Section 11-4-104.

“Entitlement holder.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Financial asset.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Holder in due course.” Code Section 11-3-302.

“Issuer” (with respect to a letter of credit or letter of credit right). Code Section 11-5-102.

“Issuer” (with respect to a security). Code Section 11-8-201.

“Issuer” (with respect to documents of title). Code Section 11-7-102.

“Lease.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Lease agreement.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Lease contract.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Leasehold interest.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Lessee.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Lessee in ordinary course of business.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Lessor.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Lessor’s residual interest.” Code Section 11-2A-103.

“Letter of credit.” Code Section 11-5-102.

“Merchant.” Code Section 11-2-104.

“Negotiable instrument.” Code Section 11-3-104.

“Nominated person.” Code Section 11-5-102.

“Note.” Code Section 11-3-104.

“Proceeds of a letter of credit.” Code Section 11-5-114.

“Prove.” Code Section 11-3-103.

“Sale.” Code Section 11-2-106.

“Securities account.” Code Section 11-8-501.

“Securities intermediary.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Security.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Security certificate.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Security entitlement.” Code Section 11-8-102.

“Uncertificated security.” Code Section 11-8-102.

Article 1 definitions and principles.Article 1 of this title contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-102, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 995, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 481, § 2-19/HB 451; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 1/SB 185; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3B-18/SB 65.

The 2002 amendment,

effective July 1, 2002, in subsection (a), deleted “, other than a security interest,” in paragraph (5) and added “or to be provided” at the end of paragraph (47).

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 27, 2010, in subsection (b), substituted the present introductory paragraph for the former provisions, which read: “Other definitions applying to this article and the Code sections in which they appear are” and added the provisions on “ ‘Issuer’ (with respect to documents of title)”. See the Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “With present intent to adopt or accept a record, to attach to or logically associate with such record an electronic sound, symbol, or process” for “To execute or otherwise adopt a symbol, or encrypt or similarly process a record in whole or in part, with the present intent of the authenticating person to identify the person and adopt or accept a record” in subparagraph (a)(7)(B); added the last sentence in paragraph (a)(11); inserted “formed or” in paragraph (a)(51); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(67) through (a)(79) as current paragraphs (a)(68) through (a)(80), respectively; added present paragraph (a)(67); and rewrote paragraph (a)(70).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted “Reserved” for “ ‘Good faith’ means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing” in paragraph (a)(44).

11-9-103.
Purchase money security interest; application of payments; burden of establishing.

Definitions.As used in this Code section, the term:

“Purchase money collateral” means goods or software that secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to that collateral.

“Purchase money obligation” means an obligation of an obligor incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral or for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of the collateral if the value is in fact so used.

Purchase money security interest in goods.A security interest in goods is a purchase money security interest:

To the extent that the goods are purchase money collateral with respect to that security interest;

If the security interest is in inventory that is or was purchase money collateral, also to the extent that the security interest secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to other inventory in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest; and

Also to the extent that the security interest secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to software in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest.

Purchase money security interest in software.A security interest in software is a purchase money security interest to the extent that the security interest also secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to goods in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest if:

The debtor acquired its interest in the software in an integrated transaction in which it acquired an interest in the goods; and

The debtor acquired its interest in the software for the principal purpose of using the software in the goods.

Consignor’s inventory purchase money security interest.The security interest of a consignor in goods that are the subject of a consignment is a purchase money security interest in inventory.

Application of payment in nonconsumer goods transaction.In a transaction other than a consumer goods transaction, if the extent to which a security interest is a purchase money security interest depends on the application of a payment to a particular obligation, the payment must be applied:

In accordance with any reasonable method of application to which the parties agree;

In the absence of the parties’ agreement to a reasonable method, in accordance with any intention of the obligor manifested at or before the time of payment; or

In the absence of an agreement to a reasonable method and a timely manifestation of the obligor’s intention, in the following order:

To obligations that are not secured; and

If more than one obligation is secured, to obligations secured by purchase money security interests in the order in which those obligations were incurred.

No loss of status of purchase money security interest in nonconsumer goods transaction.In a transaction other than a consumer goods transaction, a purchase money security interest does not lose its status as such, even if:

The purchase money collateral also secures an obligation that is not a purchase money obligation;

Collateral that is not purchase money collateral also secures the purchase money obligation; or

The purchase money obligation has been renewed, refinanced, consolidated, or restructured.

Burden of proof in nonconsumer goods transaction.In a transaction other than a consumer goods transaction, a secured party claiming a purchase money security interest has the burden of establishing the extent to which the security interest is a purchase money security interest.

Nonconsumer goods transactions; no inference.The limitation of the rules in subsections (e), (f), and (g) of this Code section to transactions other than consumer goods transactions is intended to leave to the court the determination of the applicable rules in consumer goods transactions. The court may not infer from that limitation the nature of the applicable rule in consumer goods transactions and may continue to apply established approaches.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-103, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-104.
Control of deposit account.

Requirements for control.A secured party has control of a deposit account if:

The secured party is the bank with which the deposit account is maintained;

The debtor, secured party, and bank have agreed in an authenticated record that the bank will comply with instructions originated by the secured party directing disposition of the funds in the deposit account without further consent by the debtor; or

The secured party becomes the bank’s customer with respect to the deposit account.

Debtor’s right to direct disposition.A secured party that has satisfied subsection (a) of this Code section has control, even if the debtor retains the right to direct the disposition of funds from the deposit account.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-104, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-105.
Control of electronic chattel paper.

General rule; control of electronic chattel paper.A secured party has control of electronic chattel paper if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the secured party as the person to which the chattel paper was assigned.

Specific facts giving control.A system satisfies the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section if the record or records comprising the chattel paper are created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that:

A single authoritative copy of the record or records exists which is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of this subsection, unalterable;

The authoritative copy identifies the secured party as the assignee of the record or records;

The authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the secured party or its designated custodian;

Copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the secured party;

Each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

Any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-105, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 2/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, designated the existing provisions as subsections (a) and (b); in subsection (a), added the subsection heading and added “if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the secured party as the person to which the chattel paper was assigned” at the end; in the introductory language of subsection (b), added the subsection heading and “A system satisfies the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section” at the beginning; substituted “subsection” for “Code section” in paragraph (b)(1); in paragraph (b)(4), substituted “amendments” for “revisions” near the beginning and substituted “consent” for “participation” near the end; and, in paragraph (b)(6), substituted “amendment” for “revision” near the beginning and substituted “as authorized or unauthorized” for “an authorized or unauthorized revision” at the end.

11-9-106.
Control of investment property.

Control under Code Section 11-8-106.A person has control of a certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement as provided in Code Section 11-8-106.

Control of commodity contract.A secured party has control of a commodity contract if:

The secured party is the commodity intermediary with which the commodity contract is carried; or

The commodity customer, secured party, and commodity intermediary have agreed that the commodity intermediary will apply any value distributed on account of the commodity contract as directed by the secured party without further consent by the commodity customer.

Effect of control of securities account or commodity account.A secured party having control of all security entitlements or commodity contracts carried in a securities account or commodity account has control over the securities account or commodity account.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-106, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-107.
Control of letter of credit right.

A secured party has control of a letter of credit right to the extent of any right to payment or performance by the issuer or any nominated person if the issuer or nominated person has consented to an assignment of proceeds of the letter of credit under subsection (c) of Code Section 11-5-114 or otherwise applicable law or practice.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-107, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-108.
Sufficiency of description.

Sufficiency of description.Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Code section, a description of personal or real property is sufficient, whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

Examples of reasonable identification.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, a description of collateral reasonably identifies the collateral if it identifies the collateral by:

Specific listing;

Category;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a type of collateral defined in this title;

Quantity;

Computational or allocational formula or procedure; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, any other method, if the identity of the collateral is objectively determinable.

Supergeneric description not sufficient.A description of collateral as “all the debtor’s assets” or “all the debtor’s personal property” or using words of similar import does not reasonably identify the collateral.

Investment property.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a description of a security entitlement, securities account, or commodity account is sufficient if it describes:

The collateral by those terms or as investment property; or

The underlying financial asset or commodity contract.

When description by type insufficient.A description only by type of collateral defined in this title is an insufficient description of:

A commercial tort claim; or

In a consumer transaction, consumer goods, a security entitlement, a securities account, or a commodity account.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-108, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.